Arkansas, session 2025, SB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - TRIAL COURT ADMINISTRATORS. There is
hereby established for the Administrative Office of the Courts - Trial Court
Administrators for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q226C TRIAL COURT ADMINISTRATOR 127 GRADE SGS08
*JAR038*
04-07-2025 16:40:05 JAR038

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB71
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 127

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - TRIAL COURT ADMINISTRATORS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services, Trial Court
Administrator Substitutes expenses and Trial Court Administrators expenses of
the Trial Court Administrators of the Circuit Courts for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $7,610,945
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,754,074
(03) TRIAL COURT ADMINISTRATOR EXPENSES 175,000
(04) TRIAL COURT ADMINISTRATOR SUBSTITUTES 175,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $10,715,019

SECTION 3. REGULAR SALARIES - COURT REPORTERS. There is hereby
established for the Administrative Office of the Courts - Official Court
Reporters of the Circuit Courts for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q227C COURT REPORTER 127 GRADE SGS09
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 127

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - COURT REPORTERS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services, expenses allowance,
indigent transcripts and court reporter substitutes of the Official Court
Reporters of the Circuit Courts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

04-07-2025 16:40:05 JAR038

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB71
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $8,335,221
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,920,440
(03) EXPENSES ALLOWANCE 350,000
(04) INDIGENT TRANSCRIPTS 600,000
(05) COURT REPORTER SUBSTITUTES 375,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,580,661

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - JUVENILE PROBATION & INTAKE OFFICERS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for reimbursement of a portion
of the salaries of full-time juvenile probation and intake officers in
accordance with Arkansas Code 16-13-327 and Arkansas Code 16-13-328 for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) JUVENILE PROBATION & INTAKE OFFICERS $4,618,100

SECTION 6. REGULAR SALARIES - DRUG COURT JUVENILE PROBATION & INTAKE
OFFICERS. There is hereby established for the Administrative Office of the
Courts - Drug Court Juvenile Probation & Intake Officers for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q231C DRUG COURT JUV PROB & INTAKE OFF 13 GRADE SGS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 13

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - DRUG COURT JUVENILE PROBATION & INTAKE
OFFICERS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the
Courts, to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal
services for the Drug Court Juvenile Probation & Intake Officers and
04-07-2025 16:40:05 JAR038

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB71
operating expenses for risk assessment and behavioral screenings for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $718,242
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 267,941
(03) ASSESSMENT-SCREENINGS EXPENSES 87,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,073,683

SECTION 8. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 9. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
04-07-2025 16:40:05 JAR038

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB71
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee






























04-07-2025 16:40:05 JAR038